Illinois, session 104th, HB4741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 112A-11.5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/112A-11.5)7    Sec. 112A-11.5. Issuance of protective order.8    (a) Except as provided in subsection (a-5) of this 9Section, the court shall grant the petition and enter a 10protective order if the court finds prima facie evidence that 11a crime involving domestic violence, a sexual offense, or a 12crime involving stalking has been committed. The following 13shall be considered prima facie evidence of the crime:14        (1) an information, complaint, indictment, or 15    delinquency petition, charging a crime of domestic 16    violence, a sexual offense, or stalking or charging an 17    attempt to commit a crime of domestic violence, a sexual 18    offense, or stalking;19        (2) an adjudication of delinquency, a finding of guilt 20    based upon a plea, or a finding of guilt after a trial for 21    a crime of domestic battery, a sexual crime, or stalking 22    or an attempt to commit a crime of domestic violence, a 23    sexual offense, or stalking;  HB4741 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17796 JRC 31229 b1        (3) any dispositional order issued under Section 5-710 2    of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the imposition of 3    supervision, conditional discharge, probation, periodic 4    imprisonment, parole, aftercare release, or mandatory 5    supervised release for a crime of domestic violence, a 6    sexual offense, or stalking or an attempt to commit a 7    crime of domestic violence, a sexual offense, or stalking, 8    or imprisonment in conjunction with a bond forfeiture 9    warrant; or10        (4) the entry of a protective order in a separate 11    civil case brought by the petitioner against the 12    respondent.13    (a-5) The respondent may rebut prima facie evidence of the 14crime under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Section by 15presenting evidence of a meritorious defense. The respondent 16shall file a written notice alleging a meritorious defense 17which shall be verified and supported by affidavit. The 18verified notice and affidavit shall set forth the evidence 19that will be presented at a hearing. If the court finds that 20the evidence presented at the hearing establishes a 21meritorious defense by a preponderance of the evidence, the 22court may decide not to issue a protective order. 23    (b) The petitioner shall not be denied a protective order 24because the petitioner or the respondent is a minor or solely 25upon the basis that the respondent or petitioner is 26incarcerated in a penal institution at the time of the   HB4741 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17796 JRC 31229 b1issuance of the order.2    (c) The court, when determining whether or not to issue a 3protective order, may not require physical injury on the 4person of the victim.5    (d) If the court issues a final protective order under 6this Section, the court shall afford the petitioner and 7respondent an opportunity to be heard on the remedies 8requested in the petition. 9(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18; 100-597, eff. 6-29-18.) 10    Section 10. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 11amended by changing Section 201 as follows: 12    (750 ILCS 60/201)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-1)13    Sec. 201. Persons protected by this Act. 14    (a) The following persons are protected by this Act:15        (i) any person abused by a family or household member;16        (ii) any high-risk adult with disabilities who is 17    abused, neglected, or exploited by a family or household 18    member;19        (iii) any minor child or dependent adult in the care 20    of such person;21        (iv) any person residing or employed at a private home 22    or public shelter which is housing an abused family or 23    household member; and24        (v) any of the following persons if the person is   HB4741 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17796 JRC 31229 b1    abused by a family or household member of a child:2            (A) a foster parent of that child if the child has 3        been placed in the foster parent's home by the 4        Department of Children and Family Services or by 5        another state's public child welfare agency;6            (B) a legally appointed guardian or legally 7        appointed custodian of that child;8            (C) an adoptive parent of that child; or9            (D) a prospective adoptive parent of that child if 10        the child has been placed in the prospective adoptive 11        parent's home pursuant to the Adoption Act or pursuant 12        to another state's law.13        For purposes of this paragraph (a)(v), individuals who 14    would have been considered "family or household members" 15    of the child under subsection (6) of Section 103 of this 16    Act before a termination of the parental rights with 17    respect to the child continue to meet the definition of 18    "family or household members" of the child. 19    (b) A petition for an order of protection may be filed 20only:21        (i) by a person who has been abused by a family or 22    household member or by any person on behalf of a minor 23    child or an adult who has been abused by a family or 24    household member and who, because of age, health, 25    disability, or inaccessibility, cannot file the petition;26        (ii) by any person on behalf of a high-risk adult with   HB4741 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17796 JRC 31229 b1    disabilities who has been abused, neglected, or exploited 2    by a family or household member;3        (iii) by any of the following persons if the person is 4    abused by a family or household member of a child:5            (A) a foster parent of that child if the child has 6        been placed in the foster parent's home by the 7        Department of Children and Family Services or by 8        another state's public child welfare agency;9            (B) a legally appointed guardian or legally 10        appointed custodian of that child;11            (C) an adoptive parent of that child;12            (D) a prospective adoptive parent of that child if 13        the child has been placed in the prospective adoptive 14        parent's home pursuant to the Adoption Act or pursuant 15        to another state's law.16        For purposes of this paragraph (b)(iii), individuals 17    who would have been considered "family or household 18    members" of the child under subsection (6) of Section 103 19    of this Act before a termination of the parental rights 20    with respect to the child continue to meet the definition 21    of "family or household members" of the child;22        (iv) by a crime victim who was abused by a family or 23    household member an offender prior to the incarceration of 24    the offender in a penal institution and such offender is 25    incarcerated in a penal institution at the time of the 26    filing of the petition; or  HB4741 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17796 JRC 31229 b1        (v) by any person who has previously suffered abuse by 2    a family or household member person convicted of (1) 3    domestic battery, aggravated domestic battery, aggravated 4    battery, or any other offense that would constitute 5    domestic violence or (2) a violent crime, as defined in 6    Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses 7    Act, committed against another person.8    A petition for an order of protection may not be denied 9solely upon the basis that the respondent or petitioner is 10incarcerated in a penal institution at the time of the filing 11of the petition. 12    (c) Any petition properly filed under this Act may seek 13protection for any additional persons protected by this Act.14(Source: P.A. 104-11, eff. 6-20-25.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.